Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-54] Laboratories contributing DNA
profiles to be accredited. All laboratories contributing DNA profiles for
inclusion in the state DNA data bank and database shall be accredited by the
American Society of Crime Laboratory Directors/Laboratory Accreditation Board
or any certifying body approved by the Director of the FBI. Additionally, each
laboratory shall submit to the department for review the annual report required
by the American Society of Crime Laboratory Directors/Laboratory Accreditation Board
or any certifying body approved by the Director of the FBI that documents the
laboratory's adherence to American Society of Crime Laboratory
Directors/Laboratory Accreditation Board standards or the standards of any
certifying body approved by the Director of the FBI. The requirements of this
section do not preclude DNA profiles developed in Hawaii from being searched in
a national DNA database or data bank such as the FBI's Combined DNA Index
System. [L 2005, c 112, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next